Missouri, session 2026, SB1697.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 566, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 566.250, to read as
follows:
566.250. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Anti-Epstein Child Protection Act".
2. Where statutory rape in the first degree or sexual
trafficking of a child in the first degree is charged but
not submitted or where the state waives the death penalty,
the submission to the trier and all subsequent proceedings
in the case shall proceed as in all other criminal cases.
3. Where statutory rape in the first degree or sexual
trafficking of a child in the first degree is submitted to
the trier without a waiver of the death penalty, the trial
shall proceed in two stages before the same trier. At the
first stage the trier shall decide only whether the
defendant is guilty or not guilty of any submitted offense.
The issue of punishment shall not be submitted to the trier
at the first stage. If an offense is charged other than
statutory rape in the first degree or sexual trafficking of
a child in the first degree in a count together with a count

SB 1697 2
of statutory rape in the first degree or sexual trafficking
of a child in the first degree, the trial judge shall assess
punishment on any such offense according to law, after the
defendant is found guilty of such offense and after he finds
the defendant to be a prior offender pursuant to chapter 558.
4. If statutory rape in the first degree or sexual
trafficking of a child in the first degree is submitted and
the death penalty was not waived but the trier finds the
defendant guilty of a lesser sexual offense, a second stage
of the trial shall proceed as in all other criminal cases.
The attorneys may then argue as in other criminal cases the
issue of punishment, after which the trier shall assess and
declare the punishment as in all other criminal cases.
5. If the trier at the first stage of a trial where
the death penalty was not waived finds the defendant guilty
of statutory rape in the first degree or sexual trafficking
of a child in the first degree, a second stage of the trial
shall proceed at which the only issue shall be the
punishment to be assessed and declared. Evidence in
aggravation and mitigation of punishment, may be presented
subject to the rules of evidence at criminal trials. Such
evidence may include, within the discretion of the court,
evidence concerning the victim and the impact of the offense
upon the family of the victim and others. Rebuttal and
surrebuttal evidence may be presented. The state shall be
the first to proceed. If the trier is a jury it shall be
instructed on the law. The attorneys may then argue the
issue of punishment to the jury, and the state shall have
the right to open and close the argument. The trier shall
assess and declare the punishment at life imprisonment
without eligibility for probation, parole, or release except
by act of the governor:

SB 1697 3
(1) If the trier finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that the defendant is intellectually disabled;
(2) If the trier concludes that there is evidence in
mitigation of punishment which is sufficient to outweigh the
evidence in aggravation of punishment found by the trier; or
(3) If the trier decides under all of the
circumstances not to assess and declare the punishment at
death. If the trier is a jury it shall be so instructed.
If the trier is a jury it shall be instructed before the
case is submitted that if it is unable to decide or agree
upon the punishment the court shall assess and declare the
punishment at life imprisonment without eligibility for
probation, parole, or release except by act of the governor
or death. The court shall follow the same procedure as set
out in this section whenever it is required to determine
punishment for statutory rape in the first degree or sexual
trafficking of a child in the first degree.
6. Upon written agreement of the parties and with
leave of the court, the issue of the defendant's
intellectual disability may be taken up by the court and
decided prior to trial without prejudicing the defendant's
right to have the issue submitted to the trier of fact as
provided in subsection 4 of this section.
7. As used in this section, the terms "intellectual
disability" or "intellectually disabled" refer to a
condition involving substantial limitations in general
functioning characterized by significantly subaverage
intellectual functioning with continual extensive related
deficits and limitations in two or more adaptive behaviors
such as communication, self-care, home living, social
skills, community use, self-direction, health and safety,

SB 1697 4
functional academics, or leisure and work, which conditions
are manifested and documented before eighteen years of age.
8. The provisions of this section shall only govern
offenses committed on or after August 28, 2026.
✓